src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/Pron-Oct_2016_gt-desc.yaml
    ise+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: enesekski
    ise+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: endakski
    ise+Pron+Sg+Tra+Usage/Rare: endaks
    ise+Pron+Sg+Trm: eneseni
    ise+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: enesenigi
    ise+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: endanigi
    ise+Pron+Sg+Trm+Usage/Rare: endani
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: kellegitagi
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Abe: kelletagi
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Abe+Usage/NotNorm: kellegita
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: kellegiltki
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Abl: kelleltki
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Abl+Usage/NotNorm: kellegilt
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: kellegilgi
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Ade: kellelgi
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Ade+Usage/NotNorm: kellegil
    keegi+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: kellegilegi
    keegi+Pron+Sg+All: kellelegi
    keegi+Pron+Sg+All+Usage/NotNorm: kellegile
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Com+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: kellegigagi
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Com: kellegagi
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Com+Usage/NotNorm: kellegiga
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: kellegistki
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Ela: kellestki
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Ela+Usage/NotNorm: kellegist
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: kelleginagi
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Ess: kellenagi
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Ess+Usage/NotNorm: kellegina
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Gen: kellegi
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: kellegissegi
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Ill: kellessegi
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Ill+Usage/NotNorm: kellegisse
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: kellegiski
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Ine: kelleski
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Ine+Usage/NotNorm: kellegis
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Nom: keegi
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Par: kedagi
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: kellegikski
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Tra: kellekski
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Tra+Usage/NotNorm: kellegiks
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: kelleginigi
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Trm: kellenigi
    keegi+Pron+Sg+Trm+Usage/NotNorm: kellegini
    kes+Pron+Pl+Abe: kelledeta
    kes+Pron+Pl+Abl: kelledelt
    kes+Pron+Pl+Ade: kelledel
    kes+Pron+Pl+All: kelledele
    kes+Pron+Pl+Com: kelledega
    kes+Pron+Pl+Ela: kelledest
    kes+Pron+Pl+Ess: kelledena
    kes+Pron+Pl+Gen: kellede
    kes+Pron+Pl+Ill: kelledesse
    kes+Pron+Pl+Ine: kelledes
    kes+Pron+Pl+Tra: kelledeks
    kes+Pron+Pl+Trm: kelledeni
    kes+Pron+Sg+Abe: kelleta
    kes+Pron+Sg+Abl: kellelt
    kes+Pron+Sg+Ade: kellel
    kes+Pron+Sg+Ade+Usage/Rare: kel
    kes+Pron+Sg+All: kellele
    kes+Pron+Sg+Com: kellega
    kes+Pron+Sg+Ela: kellest
    kes+Pron+Sg+Ess: kellena
    kes+Pron+Sg+Gen: kelle
    kes+Pron+Sg+Ill: kellesse
    kes+Pron+Sg+Ine: kelles
    kes+Pron+Sg+Nom: kes
    kes+Pron+Sg+Par: keda
    kes+Pron+Sg+Tra: kelleks
    kes+Pron+Sg+Trm: kelleni
    kumbki+Pron+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: kummagidki
    kumbki+Pron+Pl+Nom: kummadki
    kumbki+Pron+Pl+Nom+Usage/NotNorm: kummagid
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: kummagitagi
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Abe: kummatagi
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Abe+Usage/NotNorm: kummagita
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: kummagiltki
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Abl: kummaltki
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Abl+Usage/NotNorm: kummagilt
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: kummagilgi
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ade: kummalgi
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ade+Usage/NotNorm: kummagil
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: kummagilegi
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+All: kummalegi
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+All+Usage/NotNorm: kummagile
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Com+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: kummagigagi
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Com: kummagagi
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Com+Usage/NotNorm: kummagiga
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: kummagistki
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ela: kummastki
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ela+Usage/NotNorm: kummagist
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: kummaginagi
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ess: kummanagi
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ess+Usage/NotNorm: kummagina
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: kummagigi
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Gen: kummagi
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Gen+Usage/NotNorm: kummagi
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: kummagissegi
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ill: kumbagi
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ill+Usage/Hyp: kummassegi
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ill+Usage/NotNorm: kummagisse
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: kummagiski
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ine: kummaski
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ine+Usage/NotNorm: kummagis
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Nom: kumbki
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: kummagitki
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Par: kumbagi
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Par+Usage/NotNorm: kummagit
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: kummagikski
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Tra: kummakski
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Tra+Usage/NotNorm: kummagiks
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: kummaginigi
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Trm: kummanigi
    kumbki+Pron+Sg+Trm+Usage/NotNorm: kummagini
    kumb+Pron+Pl+Abe: kumbadeta
    kumb+Pron+Pl+Abl: kumbadelt
    kumb+Pron+Pl+Ade: kumbadel
    kumb+Pron+Pl+All: kumbadele
    kumb+Pron+Pl+Com: kumbadega
    kumb+Pron+Pl+Ela: kumbadest
    kumb+Pron+Pl+Ess: kumbadena
    kumb+Pron+Pl+Gen: kumbade
    kumb+Pron+Pl+Ill: kumbadesse
    kumb+Pron+Pl+Ine: kumbades
    kumb+Pron+Pl+Nom: kummad
    kumb+Pron+Pl+Par: kumbasid
    kumb+Pron+Pl+Par+Usage/Rare: kumbi
    kumb+Pron+Pl+Tra: kumbadeks
    kumb+Pron+Pl+Trm: kumbadeni
    kumb+Pron+Sg+Abe: kummata
    kumb+Pron+Sg+Abl: kummalt
    kumb+Pron+Sg+Ade: kummal
    kumb+Pron+Sg+All: kummale
    kumb+Pron+Sg+Com: kummaga
    kumb+Pron+Sg+Ela: kummast
    kumb+Pron+Sg+Ess: kummana
    kumb+Pron+Sg+Gen: kumma
    kumb+Pron+Sg+Ill: kumba
    kumb+Pron+Sg+Ill+Usage/Hyp: kummasse
    kumb+Pron+Sg+Ine: kummas
    kumb+Pron+Sg+Nom: kumb
    kumb+Pron+Sg+Par: kumba
    kumb+Pron+Sg+Tra: kummaks
    kumb+Pron+Sg+Trm: kummani
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: kõigitagi
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: kõikidetagi
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Abe: kõigita
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Abe+Usage/Rare: kõikideta
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: kõigiltki
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: kõikideltki
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Abl: kõigilt
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Abl+Usage/Rare: kõikidelt
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: kõigilgi
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: kõikidelgi
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Ade: kõigil
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Ade+Usage/Rare: kõikidel
    kõik+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi: kõigilegi
    kõik+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: kõikidelegi
    kõik+Pron+Pl+All: kõigile
    kõik+Pron+Pl+All+Usage/Rare: kõikidele
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: kõigigagi
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: kõikidegagi
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Com: kõigiga
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Com+Usage/Rare: kõikidega
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: kõigistki
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: kõikidestki
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Ela: kõigist
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Ela+Usage/Rare: kõikidest
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: kõiginagi
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: kõikidenagi
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Ess: kõigina
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Ess+Usage/Rare: kõikidena
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: kõigigi
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: kõikidegi
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Gen: kõigi
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Gen+Usage/Rare: kõikide
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: kõigissegi
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: kõikidessegi
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Ill: kõigisse
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Ill+Usage/Rare: kõikidesse
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: kõigiski
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: kõikideski
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Ine: kõigis
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Ine+Usage/Rare: kõikides
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Nom: kõik
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: kõigikski
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: kõikidekski
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Tra: kõigiks
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Tra+Usage/Rare: kõikideks
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: kõiginigi
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: kõikidenigi
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Trm: kõigini
    kõik+Pron+Pl+Trm+Usage/Rare: kõikideni
    kõik+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: kõigetagi
    kõik+Pron+Sg+Abe: kõigeta
    kõik+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: kõigeltki
    kõik+Pron+Sg+Abl: kõigelt
    kõik+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: kõigelgi
    kõik+Pron+Sg+Ade: kõigel
    kõik+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi: kõigelegi
    kõik+Pron+Sg+All: kõigele
    kõik+Pron+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: kõigegagi
    kõik+Pron+Sg+Com: kõigega
    kõik+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: kõigestki
    kõik+Pron+Sg+Ela: kõigest
    kõik+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: kõigenagi
    kõik+Pron+Sg+Ess: kõigena
    kõik+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: kõigegi
    kõik+Pron+Sg+Gen: kõige
    kõik+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: kõigessegi
    kõik+Pron+Sg+Ill: kõigesse
    kõik+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: kõigeski
    kõik+Pron+Sg+Ine: kõiges
    kõik+Pron+Sg+Nom: kõik
    kõik+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: kõikegi
    kõik+Pron+Sg+Par: kõike
    kõik+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: kõigekski
    kõik+Pron+Sg+Tra: kõigeks
    kõik+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: kõigenigi
    kõik+Pron+Sg+Trm: kõigeni
    meie+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: meietagi
    meie+Pron+Pl+Abe: meieta
    meie+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: meiltki
    meie+Pron+Pl+Abl: meilt
    meie+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: meilgi
    meie+Pron+Pl+Ade: meil
    meie+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi: meilegi
    meie+Pron+Pl+All: meile
    meie+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: meiegagi
    meie+Pron+Pl+Com: meiega
    meie+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: meistki
    meie+Pron+Pl+Ela: meist
    meie+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: meienagi
    meie+Pron+Pl+Ess: meiena
    meie+Pron+Pl+Gen+Emph: meie
    meie+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi+Emph: meiegi
    meie+Pron+Pl+Gen: me
    meie+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: meissegi
    meie+Pron+Pl+Ill: meisse
    meie+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: meiski
    meie+Pron+Pl+Ine: meis
    meie+Pron+Pl+Nom+Emph: meie
    meie+Pron+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi+Emph: meiegi
    meie+Pron+Pl+Nom: me
    meie+Pron+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: meidki
    meie+Pron+Pl+Par: meid
    meie+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: meiekski
    meie+Pron+Pl+Tra: meieks
    meie+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: meienigi
    meie+Pron+Pl+Trm: meieni
    mina+Pron+Sg+Com+Emph: minuga
    mina+Pron+Sg+Com+Foc/gi+Emph: minugagi
    mina+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: minutagi
    mina+Pron+Sg+Abe: minuta
    mina+Pron+Sg+Abl+Emph: minult
    mina+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi+Emph: minultki
    mina+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: multki
    mina+Pron+Sg+Abl: mult
    mina+Pron+Sg+Ade+Emph: minul
    mina+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi+Emph: minulgi
    mina+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: mulgi
    mina+Pron+Sg+Ade: mul
    mina+Pron+Sg+All+Emph: minule
    mina+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi+Emph: minulegi
    mina+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi: mullegi
    mina+Pron+Sg+All: mulle
    mina+Pron+Sg+Com: muga
    mina+Pron+Sg+Ela+Emph: minust
    mina+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi+Emph: minustki
    mina+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: mustki
    mina+Pron+Sg+Ela: must
    mina+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: minunagi
    mina+Pron+Sg+Ess: minuna
    mina+Pron+Sg+Gen+Emph: minu
    mina+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi+Emph: minugi
    mina+Pron+Sg+Gen: mu
    mina+Pron+Sg+Ill+Emph: minusse
    mina+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Emph: minussegi
    mina+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: mussegi
    mina+Pron+Sg+Ill: musse
    mina+Pron+Sg+Ine+Emph: minus
    mina+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi+Emph: minuski
    mina+Pron+Sg+Ine: mus
    mina+Pron+Sg+Nom+Emph: mina
    mina+Pron+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi+Emph: minagi
    mina+Pron+Sg+Nom: ma
    mina+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: mindki
    mina+Pron+Sg+Par: mind
    mina+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: minukski
    mina+Pron+Sg+Tra: minuks
    mina+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: minunigi
    mina+Pron+Sg+Trm: minuni
    miski+Pron+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: miskidki
    miski+Pron+Pl+Nom+Usage/NotNorm: miskid
    miski+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: [millegitagi, miskitagi]
    miski+Pron+Sg+Abe: milletagi
    miski+Pron+Sg+Abe+Usage/NotNorm: [millegita, miskita]
    miski+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: [millegiltki, miskiltki]
    miski+Pron+Sg+Abl: milleltki
    miski+Pron+Sg+Abl+Usage/NotNorm: [millegilt, miskilt]
    miski+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: [millegilgi, miskilgi]
    miski+Pron+Sg+Ade: millelgi
    miski+Pron+Sg+Ade+Usage/NotNorm: [millegil, miskil]
    miski+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: [millegilegi, miskilegi]
    miski+Pron+Sg+All: millelegi
    miski+Pron+Sg+All+Usage/NotNorm: [millegile, miskile]
    miski+Pron+Sg+Com+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: [millegigagi, miskigagi]
    miski+Pron+Sg+Com: millegagi
    miski+Pron+Sg+Com+Usage/NotNorm: [millegiga, miskiga]
    miski+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: [millegistki, miskistki]
    miski+Pron+Sg+Ela: millestki
    miski+Pron+Sg+Ela+Usage/NotNorm: [millegist, miskist]
